Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1025.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 15, chapter 7, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 15-709, to read: START_STATUTE15-709. Science curricula; instructional requirements Notwithstanding any other law, a public school may provide instruction in evolution by natural selection only if the school provides concurrent instruction in intelligent design. END_STATUTE